Illinois, session 104th, HB3273.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 14-12 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/14-12)7    Sec. 14-12. Hospital rate reform payment system. The 8hospital payment system pursuant to Section 14-11 of this 9Article shall be as follows:10    (a) Inpatient hospital services. Effective for discharges 11on and after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 12104th General Assembly July 1, 2014, reimbursement for 13inpatient general acute care services shall utilize the All 14Patient Refined Diagnosis Related Grouping (APR-DRG) software, 15version 30, distributed by Solventum previously known as 3MTM 16Health Information System. Solventum shall be the exclusive 17provider of this software unless the Department determines 18that Solventum is unable to meet the required operational or 19contractual terms. Only under such circumstances may an 20alternative authorized provider of the software be considered. 21        (1) The Department shall establish Medicaid weighting 22    factors to be used in the reimbursement system established 23    under this subsection. Initial weighting factors shall be   HB3273- 2 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1    the weighting factors as published by the authorized 2    provider of this software 3M Health Information System, 3    associated with Version 30.0 adjusted for the Illinois 4    experience. 5        (2) The Department shall establish a 6    statewide-standardized amount to be used in the inpatient 7    reimbursement system. The Department shall publish these 8    amounts on its website no later than 10 calendar days 9    prior to their effective date. 10        (3) In addition to the statewide-standardized amount, 11    the Department shall develop adjusters to adjust the rate 12    of reimbursement for critical Medicaid providers or 13    services for trauma, transplantation services, perinatal 14    care, and Graduate Medical Education (GME). 15        (4) The Department shall develop add-on payments to 16    account for exceptionally costly inpatient stays, 17    consistent with Medicare outlier principles. Outlier fixed 18    loss thresholds may be updated to control for excessive 19    growth in outlier payments no more frequently than on an 20    annual basis, but at least once every 4 years. Upon 21    updating the fixed loss thresholds, the Department shall 22    be required to update base rates within 12 months.23        (5) The Department shall define those hospitals or 24    distinct parts of hospitals that shall be exempt from the 25    APR-DRG reimbursement system established under this 26    Section. The Department shall publish these hospitals'   HB3273- 3 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1    inpatient rates on its website no later than 10 calendar 2    days prior to their effective date. 3        (6) Beginning July 1, 2014 and ending on December 31, 4    2023, in addition to the statewide-standardized amount, 5    the Department shall develop an adjustor to adjust the 6    rate of reimbursement for safety-net hospitals defined in 7    Section 5-5e.1 of this Code excluding pediatric hospitals. 8        (7) Beginning July 1, 2014, in addition to the 9    statewide-standardized amount, the Department shall 10    develop an adjustor to adjust the rate of reimbursement 11    for Illinois freestanding inpatient psychiatric hospitals 12    that are not designated as children's hospitals by the 13    Department but are primarily treating patients under the 14    age of 21. 15        (7.5) (Blank).16        (8) Beginning July 1, 2018, in addition to the 17    statewide-standardized amount, the Department shall adjust 18    the rate of reimbursement for hospitals designated by the 19    Department of Public Health as a Perinatal Level II or II+ 20    center by applying the same adjustor that is applied to 21    Perinatal and Obstetrical care cases for Perinatal Level 22    III centers, as of December 31, 2017.23        (9) Beginning July 1, 2018, in addition to the 24    statewide-standardized amount, the Department shall apply 25    the same adjustor that is applied to trauma cases as of 26    December 31, 2017 to inpatient claims to treat patients   HB3273- 4 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1    with burns, including, but not limited to, APR-DRGs 841, 2    842, 843, and 844.3        (10) Beginning July 1, 2018, the 4    statewide-standardized amount for inpatient general acute 5    care services shall be uniformly increased so that base 6    claims projected reimbursement is increased by an amount 7    equal to the funds allocated in paragraph (1) of 8    subsection (b) of Section 5A-12.6, less the amount 9    allocated under paragraphs (8) and (9) of this subsection 10    and paragraphs (3) and (4) of subsection (b) multiplied by 11    40%.12        (11) Beginning July 1, 2018, the reimbursement for 13    inpatient rehabilitation services shall be increased by 14    the addition of a $96 per day add-on.15    (b) Outpatient hospital services. Effective for dates of 16service on and after the effective date of this amendatory Act 17of the 104th General Assembly July 1, 2014, reimbursement for 18outpatient services shall utilize the Enhanced Ambulatory 19Procedure Grouping (EAPG) software, version 3.7 distributed by 20Solventum previously known as 3MTM Health Information System. 21Solventum shall be the exclusive provider of this software 22unless the Department determines that Solventum is unable to 23meet the required operational or contractual terms. Only under 24such circumstances may an alternative authorized provider of 25the software be considered. 26        (1) The Department shall establish Medicaid weighting   HB3273- 5 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1    factors to be used in the reimbursement system established 2    under this subsection. The initial weighting factors shall 3    be the weighting factors as published by the authorized 4    provider 3M Health Information System, associated with 5    Version 3.7. 6        (2) The Department shall establish service specific 7    statewide-standardized amounts to be used in the 8    reimbursement system. 9            (A) The initial statewide standardized amounts, 10        with the labor portion adjusted by the Calendar Year 11        2013 Medicare Outpatient Prospective Payment System 12        wage index with reclassifications, shall be published 13        by the Department on its website no later than 10 14        calendar days prior to their effective date. 15            (B) The Department shall establish adjustments to 16        the statewide-standardized amounts for each Critical 17        Access Hospital, as designated by the Department of 18        Public Health in accordance with 42 CFR 485, Subpart 19        F. For outpatient services provided on or before June 20        30, 2018, the EAPG standardized amounts are determined 21        separately for each critical access hospital such that 22        simulated EAPG payments using outpatient base period 23        paid claim data plus payments under Section 5A-12.4 of 24        this Code net of the associated tax costs are equal to 25        the estimated costs of outpatient base period claims 26        data with a rate year cost inflation factor applied.   HB3273- 6 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1        (3) In addition to the statewide-standardized amounts, 2    the Department shall develop adjusters to adjust the rate 3    of reimbursement for critical Medicaid hospital outpatient 4    providers or services, including outpatient high volume or 5    safety-net hospitals. Beginning July 1, 2018, the 6    outpatient high volume adjustor shall be increased to 7    increase annual expenditures associated with this adjustor 8    by $79,200,000, based on the State Fiscal Year 2015 base 9    year data and this adjustor shall apply to public 10    hospitals, except for large public hospitals, as defined 11    under 89 Ill. Adm. Code 148.25(a).12        (4) Beginning July 1, 2018, in addition to the 13    statewide standardized amounts, the Department shall make 14    an add-on payment for outpatient expensive devices and 15    drugs. This add-on payment shall at least apply to claim 16    lines that: (i) are assigned with one of the following 17    EAPGs: 490, 1001 to 1020, and coded with one of the 18    following revenue codes: 0274 to 0276, 0278; or (ii) are 19    assigned with one of the following EAPGs: 430 to 441, 443, 20    444, 460 to 465, 495, 496, 1090. The add-on payment shall 21    be calculated as follows: the claim line's covered charges 22    multiplied by the hospital's total acute cost to charge 23    ratio, less the claim line's EAPG payment plus $1,000, 24    multiplied by 0.8.25        (5) Beginning July 1, 2018, the statewide-standardized 26    amounts for outpatient services shall be increased by a   HB3273- 7 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1    uniform percentage so that base claims projected 2    reimbursement is increased by an amount equal to no less 3    than the funds allocated in paragraph (1) of subsection 4    (b) of Section 5A-12.6, less the amount allocated under 5    paragraphs (8) and (9) of subsection (a) and paragraphs 6    (3) and (4) of this subsection multiplied by 46%. 7        (6) Effective for dates of service on or after July 1, 8    2018, the Department shall establish adjustments to the 9    statewide-standardized amounts for each Critical Access 10    Hospital, as designated by the Department of Public Health 11    in accordance with 42 CFR 485, Subpart F, such that each 12    Critical Access Hospital's standardized amount for 13    outpatient services shall be increased by the applicable 14    uniform percentage determined pursuant to paragraph (5) of 15    this subsection. It is the intent of the General Assembly 16    that the adjustments required under this paragraph (6) by 17    Public Act 100-1181 shall be applied retroactively to 18    claims for dates of service provided on or after July 1, 19    2018. 20        (7) Effective for dates of service on or after March 21    8, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 100-1181), the 22    Department shall recalculate and implement an updated 23    statewide-standardized amount for outpatient services 24    provided by hospitals that are not Critical Access 25    Hospitals to reflect the applicable uniform percentage 26    determined pursuant to paragraph (5).   HB3273- 8 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1            (1) Any recalculation to the 2        statewide-standardized amounts for outpatient services 3        provided by hospitals that are not Critical Access 4        Hospitals shall be the amount necessary to achieve the 5        increase in the statewide-standardized amounts for 6        outpatient services increased by a uniform percentage, 7        so that base claims projected reimbursement is 8        increased by an amount equal to no less than the funds 9        allocated in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of 10        Section 5A-12.6, less the amount allocated under 11        paragraphs (8) and (9) of subsection (a) and 12        paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection, for all 13        hospitals that are not Critical Access Hospitals, 14        multiplied by 46%.15            (2) It is the intent of the General Assembly that 16        the recalculations required under this paragraph (7) 17        by Public Act 100-1181 shall be applied prospectively 18        to claims for dates of service provided on or after 19        March 8, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 20        100-1181) and that no recoupment or repayment by the 21        Department or an MCO of payments attributable to 22        recalculation under this paragraph (7), issued to the 23        hospital for dates of service on or after July 1, 2018 24        and before March 8, 2019 (the effective date of Public 25        Act 100-1181), shall be permitted. 26        (8) The Department shall ensure that all necessary   HB3273- 9 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1    adjustments to the managed care organization capitation 2    base rates necessitated by the adjustments under 3    subparagraph (6) or (7) of this subsection are completed 4    and applied retroactively in accordance with Section 5    5-30.8 of this Code within 90 days of March 8, 2019 (the 6    effective date of Public Act 100-1181). 7        (9) Within 60 days after federal approval of the 8    change made to the assessment in Section 5A-2 by Public 9    Act 101-650, the Department shall incorporate into the 10    EAPG system for outpatient services those services 11    performed by hospitals currently billed through the 12    Non-Institutional Provider billing system. 13    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 14beginning with dates of service on and after January 1, 2023, 15any general acute care hospital with more than 500 outpatient 16psychiatric Medicaid services to persons under 19 years of age 17in any calendar year shall be paid the outpatient add-on 18payment of no less than $113. 19    (c) In consultation with the hospital community, the 20Department is authorized to replace 89 Ill. Adm. Code 152.150 21as published in 38 Ill. Reg. 4980 through 4986 within 12 months 22of June 16, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-651). If 23the Department does not replace these rules within 12 months 24of June 16, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-651), the 25rules in effect for 152.150 as published in 38 Ill. Reg. 4980 26through 4986 shall remain in effect until modified by rule by   HB3273- 10 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1the Department. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed 2to mandate that the Department file a replacement rule. 3    (d) Transition period. There shall be a transition period 4to the reimbursement systems authorized under this Section 5that shall begin on the effective date of these systems and 6continue until June 30, 2018, unless extended by rule by the 7Department. To help provide an orderly and predictable 8transition to the new reimbursement systems and to preserve 9and enhance access to the hospital services during this 10transition, the Department shall allocate a transitional 11hospital access pool of at least $290,000,000 annually so that 12transitional hospital access payments are made to hospitals. 13        (1) After the transition period, the Department may 14    begin incorporating the transitional hospital access pool 15    into the base rate structure; however, the transitional 16    hospital access payments in effect on June 30, 2018 shall 17    continue to be paid, if continued under Section 5A-16. 18        (2) After the transition period, if the Department 19    reduces payments from the transitional hospital access 20    pool, it shall increase base rates, develop new adjustors, 21    adjust current adjustors, develop new hospital access 22    payments based on updated information, or any combination 23    thereof by an amount equal to the decreases proposed in 24    the transitional hospital access pool payments, ensuring 25    that the entire transitional hospital access pool amount 26    shall continue to be used for hospital payments.   HB3273- 11 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1    (d-5) Hospital and health care transformation program. The 2Department shall develop a hospital and health care 3transformation program to provide financial assistance to 4hospitals in transforming their services and care models to 5better align with the needs of the communities they serve. The 6payments authorized in this Section shall be subject to 7approval by the federal government.8        (1) Phase 1. In State fiscal years 2019 through 2020, 9    the Department shall allocate funds from the transitional 10    access hospital pool to create a hospital transformation 11    pool of at least $262,906,870 annually and make hospital 12    transformation payments to hospitals. Subject to Section 13    5A-16, in State fiscal years 2019 and 2020, an Illinois 14    hospital that received either a transitional hospital 15    access payment under subsection (d) or a supplemental 16    payment under subsection (f) of this Section in State 17    fiscal year 2018, shall receive a hospital transformation 18    payment as follows:19            (A) If the hospital's Rate Year 2017 Medicaid 20        inpatient utilization rate is equal to or greater than 21        45%, the hospital transformation payment shall be 22        equal to 100% of the sum of its transitional hospital 23        access payment authorized under subsection (d) and any 24        supplemental payment authorized under subsection (f).25            (B) If the hospital's Rate Year 2017 Medicaid 26        inpatient utilization rate is equal to or greater than   HB3273- 12 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1        25% but less than 45%, the hospital transformation 2        payment shall be equal to 75% of the sum of its 3        transitional hospital access payment authorized under 4        subsection (d) and any supplemental payment authorized 5        under subsection (f).6            (C) If the hospital's Rate Year 2017 Medicaid 7        inpatient utilization rate is less than 25%, the 8        hospital transformation payment shall be equal to 50% 9        of the sum of its transitional hospital access payment 10        authorized under subsection (d) and any supplemental 11        payment authorized under subsection (f).12        (2) Phase 2. 13            (A) The funding amount from phase one shall be 14        incorporated into directed payment and pass-through 15        payment methodologies described in Section 5A-12.7.16            (B) Because there are communities in Illinois that 17        experience significant health care disparities due to 18        systemic racism, as recently emphasized by the 19        COVID-19 pandemic, aggravated by social determinants 20        of health and a lack of sufficiently allocated health 21        care healthcare resources, particularly 22        community-based services, preventive care, obstetric 23        care, chronic disease management, and specialty care, 24        the Department shall establish a health care 25        transformation program that shall be supported by the 26        transformation funding pool. It is the intention of   HB3273- 13 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1        the General Assembly that innovative partnerships 2        funded by the pool must be designed to establish or 3        improve integrated health care delivery systems that 4        will provide significant access to the Medicaid and 5        uninsured populations in their communities, as well as 6        improve health care equity. It is also the intention 7        of the General Assembly that partnerships recognize 8        and address the disparities revealed by the COVID-19 9        pandemic, as well as the need for post-COVID care. 10        During State fiscal years 2021 through 2027, the 11        hospital and health care transformation program shall 12        be supported by an annual transformation funding pool 13        of up to $150,000,000, pending federal matching funds, 14        to be allocated during the specified fiscal years for 15        the purpose of facilitating hospital and health care 16        transformation. No disbursement of moneys for 17        transformation projects from the transformation 18        funding pool described under this Section shall be 19        considered an award, a grant, or an expenditure of 20        grant funds. Funding agreements made in accordance 21        with the transformation program shall be considered 22        purchases of care under the Illinois Procurement Code, 23        and funds shall be expended by the Department in a 24        manner that maximizes federal funding to expend the 25        entire allocated amount.26            The Department shall convene, within 30 days after   HB3273- 14 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1        March 12, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 2        101-655), a workgroup that includes subject matter 3        experts on health care healthcare disparities and 4        stakeholders from distressed communities, which could 5        be a subcommittee of the Medicaid Advisory Committee, 6        to review and provide recommendations on how 7        Department policy, including health care 8        transformation, can improve health disparities and the 9        impact on communities disproportionately affected by 10        COVID-19. The workgroup shall consider and make 11        recommendations on the following issues: a community 12        safety-net designation of certain hospitals, racial 13        equity, and a regional partnership to bring additional 14        specialty services to communities. 15            (C) As provided in paragraph (9) of Section 3 of 16        the Illinois Health Facilities Planning Act, any 17        hospital participating in the transformation program 18        may be excluded from the requirements of the Illinois 19        Health Facilities Planning Act for those projects 20        related to the hospital's transformation. To be 21        eligible, the hospital must submit to the Health 22        Facilities and Services Review Board approval from the 23        Department that the project is a part of the 24        hospital's transformation.25            (D) As provided in subsection (a-20) of Section 26        32.5 of the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems   HB3273- 15 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1        Act, a hospital that received hospital transformation 2        payments under this Section may convert to a 3        freestanding emergency center. To be eligible for such 4        a conversion, the hospital must submit to the 5        Department of Public Health approval from the 6        Department that the project is a part of the 7        hospital's transformation.8            (E) Criteria for proposals. To be eligible for 9        funding under this Section, a transformation proposal 10        shall meet all of the following criteria: 11                (i) the proposal shall be designed based on 12            community needs assessment completed by either a 13            University partner or other qualified entity with 14            significant community input;15                (ii) the proposal shall be a collaboration 16            among providers across the care and community 17            spectrum, including preventative care, primary 18            care specialty care, hospital services, mental 19            health and substance abuse services, as well as 20            community-based entities that address the social 21            determinants of health;22                (iii) the proposal shall be specifically 23            designed to improve health care healthcare 24            outcomes and reduce health care healthcare 25            disparities, and improve the coordination, 26            effectiveness, and efficiency of care delivery;  HB3273- 16 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1                (iv) the proposal shall have specific 2            measurable metrics related to disparities that 3            will be tracked by the Department and made public 4            by the Department;5                (v) the proposal shall include a commitment to 6            include Business Enterprise Program certified 7            vendors or other entities controlled and managed 8            by minorities or women; and 9                (vi) the proposal shall specifically increase 10            access to primary, preventive, or specialty care. 11            (F) Entities eligible to be funded. 12                (i) Proposals for funding should come from 13            collaborations operating in one of the most 14            distressed communities in Illinois as determined 15            by the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and 16            Prevention's Social Vulnerability Index for 17            Illinois and areas disproportionately impacted by 18            COVID-19 or from rural areas of Illinois.19                (ii) The Department shall prioritize 20            partnerships from distressed communities, which 21            include Business Enterprise Program certified 22            vendors or other entities controlled and managed 23            by minorities or women and also include one or 24            more of the following: safety-net hospitals, 25            critical access hospitals, the campuses of 26            hospitals that have closed since January 1, 2018,   HB3273- 17 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1            or other health care healthcare providers designed 2            to address specific health care healthcare 3            disparities, including the impact of COVID-19 on 4            individuals and the community and the need for 5            post-COVID care. All funded proposals must include 6            specific measurable goals and metrics related to 7            improved outcomes and reduced disparities which 8            shall be tracked by the Department.9                (iii) The Department should target the funding 10            in the following ways: $30,000,000 of 11            transformation funds to projects that are a 12            collaboration between a safety-net hospital, 13            particularly community safety-net hospitals, and 14            other providers and designed to address specific 15            health care healthcare disparities, $20,000,000 of 16            transformation funds to collaborations between 17            safety-net hospitals and a larger hospital partner 18            that increases specialty care in distressed 19            communities, $30,000,000 of transformation funds 20            to projects that are a collaboration between 21            hospitals and other providers in distressed areas 22            of the State designed to address specific health 23            care healthcare disparities, $15,000,000 to 24            collaborations between critical access hospitals 25            and other providers designed to address specific 26            health care healthcare disparities, and   HB3273- 18 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1            $15,000,000 to cross-provider collaborations 2            designed to address specific health care 3            healthcare disparities, and $5,000,000 to 4            collaborations that focus on workforce 5            development. 6                (iv) The Department may allocate up to 7            $5,000,000 for planning, racial equity analysis, 8            or consulting resources for the Department or 9            entities without the resources to develop a plan 10            to meet the criteria of this Section. Any contract 11            for consulting services issued by the Department 12            under this subparagraph shall comply with the 13            provisions of Section 5-45 of the State Officials 14            and Employees Ethics Act. Based on availability of 15            federal funding, the Department may directly 16            procure consulting services or provide funding to 17            the collaboration. The provision of resources 18            under this subparagraph is not a guarantee that a 19            project will be approved. 20                (v) The Department shall take steps to ensure 21            that safety-net hospitals operating in 22            under-resourced communities receive priority 23            access to hospital and health care healthcare 24            transformation funds, including consulting funds, 25            as provided under this Section. 26            (G) Process for submitting and approving projects   HB3273- 19 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1        for distressed communities. The Department shall issue 2        a template for application. The Department shall post 3        any proposal received on the Department's website for 4        at least 2 weeks for public comment, and any such 5        public comment shall also be considered in the review 6        process. Applicants may request that proprietary 7        financial information be redacted from publicly posted 8        proposals and the Department in its discretion may 9        agree. Proposals for each distressed community must 10        include all of the following: 11                (i) A detailed description of how the project 12            intends to affect the goals outlined in this 13            subsection, describing new interventions, new 14            technology, new structures, and other changes to 15            the health care healthcare delivery system 16            planned.17                (ii) A detailed description of the racial and 18            ethnic makeup of the entities' board and 19            leadership positions and the salaries of the 20            executive staff of entities in the partnership 21            that is seeking to obtain funding under this 22            Section. 23                (iii) A complete budget, including an overall 24            timeline and a detailed pathway to sustainability 25            within a 5-year period, specifying other sources 26            of funding, such as in-kind, cost-sharing, or   HB3273- 20 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1            private donations, particularly for capital needs. 2            There is an expectation that parties to the 3            transformation project dedicate resources to the 4            extent they are able and that these expectations 5            are delineated separately for each entity in the 6            proposal.7                (iv) A description of any new entities formed 8            or other legal relationships between collaborating 9            entities and how funds will be allocated among 10            participants. 11                (v) A timeline showing the evolution of sites 12            and specific services of the project over a 5-year 13            period, including services available to the 14            community by site.15                (vi) Clear milestones indicating progress 16            toward the proposed goals of the proposal as 17            checkpoints along the way to continue receiving 18            funding. The Department is authorized to refine 19            these milestones in agreements, and is authorized 20            to impose reasonable penalties, including 21            repayment of funds, for substantial lack of 22            progress.23                (vii) A clear statement of the level of 24            commitment the project will include for minorities 25            and women in contracting opportunities, including 26            as equity partners where applicable, or as   HB3273- 21 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1            subcontractors and suppliers in all phases of the 2            project.3                (viii) If the community study utilized is not 4            the study commissioned and published by the 5            Department, the applicant must define the 6            methodology used, including documentation of clear 7            community participation.8                (ix) A description of the process used in 9            collaborating with all levels of government in the 10            community served in the development of the 11            project, including, but not limited to, 12            legislators and officials of other units of local 13            government.14                (x) Documentation of a community input process 15            in the community served, including links to 16            proposal materials on public websites.17                (xi) Verifiable project milestones and quality 18            metrics that will be impacted by transformation. 19            These project milestones and quality metrics must 20            be identified with improvement targets that must 21            be met.22                (xii) Data on the number of existing employees 23            by various job categories and wage levels by the 24            zip code of the employees' residence and 25            benchmarks for the continued maintenance and 26            improvement of these levels. The proposal must   HB3273- 22 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1            also describe any retraining or other workforce 2            development planned for the new project.3                (xiii) If a new entity is created by the 4            project, a description of how the board will be 5            reflective of the community served by the 6            proposal. 7                (xiv) An explanation of how the proposal will 8            address the existing disparities that exacerbated 9            the impact of COVID-19 and the need for post-COVID 10            care in the community, if applicable. 11                (xv) An explanation of how the proposal is 12            designed to increase access to care, including 13            specialty care based upon the community's needs. 14            (H) The Department shall evaluate proposals for 15        compliance with the criteria listed under subparagraph 16        (G). Proposals meeting all of the criteria may be 17        eligible for funding with the areas of focus 18        prioritized as described in item (ii) of subparagraph 19        (F). Based on the funds available, the Department may 20        negotiate funding agreements with approved applicants 21        to maximize federal funding. Nothing in this 22        subsection requires that an approved project be funded 23        to the level requested. Agreements shall specify the 24        amount of funding anticipated annually, the 25        methodology of payments, the limit on the number of 26        years such funding may be provided, and the milestones   HB3273- 23 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1        and quality metrics that must be met by the projects in 2        order to continue to receive funding during each year 3        of the program. Agreements shall specify the terms and 4        conditions under which a health care facility that 5        receives funds under a purchase of care agreement and 6        closes in violation of the terms of the agreement must 7        pay an early closure fee no greater than 50% of the 8        funds it received under the agreement, prior to the 9        Health Facilities and Services Review Board 10        considering an application for closure of the 11        facility. Any project that is funded shall be required 12        to provide quarterly written progress reports, in a 13        form prescribed by the Department, and at a minimum 14        shall include the progress made in achieving any 15        milestones or metrics or Business Enterprise Program 16        commitments in its plan. The Department may reduce or 17        end payments, as set forth in transformation plans, if 18        milestones or metrics or Business Enterprise Program 19        commitments are not achieved. The Department shall 20        seek to make payments from the transformation fund in 21        a manner that is eligible for federal matching funds. 22            In reviewing the proposals, the Department shall 23        take into account the needs of the community, data 24        from the study commissioned by the Department from the 25        University of Illinois-Chicago if applicable, feedback 26        from public comment on the Department's website, as   HB3273- 24 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1        well as how the proposal meets the criteria listed 2        under subparagraph (G). Alignment with the 3        Department's overall strategic initiatives shall be an 4        important factor. To the extent that fiscal year 5        funding is not adequate to fund all eligible projects 6        that apply, the Department shall prioritize 7        applications that most comprehensively and effectively 8        address the criteria listed under subparagraph (G). 9        (3) (Blank).10        (4) Hospital Transformation Review Committee. There is 11    created the Hospital Transformation Review Committee. The 12    Committee shall consist of 14 members. No later than 30 13    days after March 12, 2018 (the effective date of Public 14    Act 100-581), the 4 legislative leaders shall each appoint 15    3 members; the Governor shall appoint the Director of 16    Healthcare and Family Services, or his or her designee, as 17    a member; and the Director of Healthcare and Family 18    Services shall appoint one member. Any vacancy shall be 19    filled by the applicable appointing authority within 15 20    calendar days. The members of the Committee shall select a 21    Chair and a Vice-Chair from among its members, provided 22    that the Chair and Vice-Chair cannot be appointed by the 23    same appointing authority and must be from different 24    political parties. The Chair shall have the authority to 25    establish a meeting schedule and convene meetings of the 26    Committee, and the Vice-Chair shall have the authority to   HB3273- 25 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1    convene meetings in the absence of the Chair. The 2    Committee may establish its own rules with respect to 3    meeting schedule, notice of meetings, and the disclosure 4    of documents; however, the Committee shall not have the 5    power to subpoena individuals or documents and any rules 6    must be approved by 9 of the 14 members. The Committee 7    shall perform the functions described in this Section and 8    advise and consult with the Director in the administration 9    of this Section. In addition to reviewing and approving 10    the policies, procedures, and rules for the hospital and 11    health care transformation program, the Committee shall 12    consider and make recommendations related to qualifying 13    criteria and payment methodologies related to safety-net 14    hospitals and children's hospitals. Members of the 15    Committee appointed by the legislative leaders shall be 16    subject to the jurisdiction of the Legislative Ethics 17    Commission, not the Executive Ethics Commission, and all 18    requests under the Freedom of Information Act shall be 19    directed to the applicable Freedom of Information officer 20    for the General Assembly. The Department shall provide 21    operational support to the Committee as necessary. The 22    Committee is dissolved on April 1, 2019. 23    (e) Beginning 36 months after initial implementation, the 24Department shall update the reimbursement components in 25subsections (a) and (b), including standardized amounts and 26weighting factors, and at least once every 4 years and no more   HB3273- 26 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1frequently than annually thereafter. The Department shall 2publish these updates on its website no later than 30 calendar 3days prior to their effective date. 4    (f) Continuation of supplemental payments. Any 5supplemental payments authorized under 89 Illinois 6Administrative Code 148 effective January 1, 2014 and that 7continue during the period of July 1, 2014 through December 831, 2014 shall remain in effect as long as the assessment 9imposed by Section 5A-2 that is in effect on December 31, 2017 10remains in effect. 11    (g) Notwithstanding subsections (a) through (f) of this 12Section and notwithstanding the changes authorized under 13Section 5-5b.1, any updates to the system shall not result in 14any diminishment of the overall effective rates of 15reimbursement as of the implementation date of the new system 16(July 1, 2014). These updates shall not preclude variations in 17any individual component of the system or hospital rate 18variations. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the 19Department from increasing the rates of reimbursement or 20developing payments to ensure access to hospital services. 21Nothing in this Section shall be construed to guarantee a 22minimum amount of spending in the aggregate or per hospital as 23spending may be impacted by factors, including, but not 24limited to, the number of individuals in the medical 25assistance program and the severity of illness of the 26individuals.  HB3273- 27 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1    (h) The Department shall have the authority to modify by 2rulemaking any changes to the rates or methodologies in this 3Section as required by the federal government to obtain 4federal financial participation for expenditures made under 5this Section. 6    (i) Except for subsections (g) and (h) of this Section, 7the Department shall, pursuant to subsection (c) of Section 85-40 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, provide for 9presentation at the June 2014 hearing of the Joint Committee 10on Administrative Rules (JCAR) additional written notice to 11JCAR of the following rules in order to commence the second 12notice period for the following rules: rules published in the 13Illinois Register, rule dated February 21, 2014 at 38 Ill. 14Reg. 4559 (Medical Payment), 4628 (Specialized Health Care 15Delivery Systems), 4640 (Hospital Services), 4932 (Diagnostic 16Related Grouping (DRG) Prospective Payment System (PPS)), and 174977 (Hospital Reimbursement Changes), and published in the 18Illinois Register dated March 21, 2014 at 38 Ill. Reg. 6499 19(Specialized Health Care Delivery Systems) and 6505 (Hospital 20Services).21    (j) Out-of-state hospitals. Beginning July 1, 2018, for 22purposes of determining for State fiscal years 2019 and 2020 23and subsequent fiscal years the hospitals eligible for the 24payments authorized under subsections (a) and (b) of this 25Section, the Department shall include out-of-state hospitals 26that are designated a Level I pediatric trauma center or a   HB3273- 28 -LRB104 10515 KTG 20590 b1Level I trauma center by the Department of Public Health as of 2December 1, 2017.3    (k) The Department shall notify each hospital and managed 4care organization, in writing, of the impact of the updates 5under this Section at least 30 calendar days prior to their 6effective date. 7    (l) This Section is subject to Section 14-12.5. 8(Source: P.A. 102-682, eff. 12-10-21; 102-1037, eff. 6-2-22; 9103-102, eff. 6-16-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; revised 1010-16-24.)